sv: Typ av bakgrundsbelysning för hastighetsmätare: Elektroluminiscent (EL); Glödlampa; LED; Ingen; Annat
nb: Bakgrunnsbelysningstype for speedometer: Elektroluminiscerende (EL); Glødelampe; LED; Ingen; Annet
ko: 속도계 백라이트 유형: 전계 발광(EL); 백열등; LED; 없음; 기타
el: Τύπος οπίσθιου φωτισμού ταχύμετρου: Ηλεκτροφωταύγεια (EL); Πυράκτωσης; LED; Κανένας; Άλλο
th: ประเภทไฟแบ็คไลท์มาตรวัดความเร็ว: อิเล็กโทรลูมิเนสเซนซ์ (EL); หลอดไส้; LED; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
nl: Snelheidsmeter achtergrondverlichtingstype: Elektroluminescent (EL); Gloeilamp; Led; Geen; Overige
hr-HR: Vrsta pozadinskog osvjetljenja brzinomjera: Elektroluminiscentno (EL); Inkandescentno; LED; Bez; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta osvetlitve ozadja merilnika hitrosti: Elektroluminiscentna (EL); Z žarilno nitko; LED; Brez; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de retroiluminação do velocímetro: Eletroluminescente (EL); Incandescente; LED; Nenhum; Outro
en: Speedometer backlight type: Electroluminescent (EL); Incandescent; LED; None; Other
ja: スピードメーターバックライトタイプ: エレクトロルミネッセンス (EL); 白熱球; LED; なし; その他
vi: Loại đèn nền đồng hồ tốc độ: Phát quang điện tử (EL); Sợi đốt; LED; Không có; Khác
cs: Typ podsvícení rychloměru: Elektroluminiscenční (EL); Žárovkové; LED; Žádné; Jiné
zh-TW: 速度計背光類型: 電致發光 (EL); 白熾燈; LED; 無; 其他
pt-BR: Velocímetro retroiluminação tipo: Eletroluminescente (EL); Incandescente; LED; Nenhum; Outros
lt-LT: Spidometro apšvietimo tipas: Elektroliuminescencinis (EL); Kaitrinis; LED; Nėra; Kita
ro-RO: Tip de iluminare de fundal pentru vitezometru: Electroluminiscent (EL); Incandescent; LED; Niciuna; Altele
ru: Тип подсветки спидометра: Электролюминесцентная (EL); Лампа накаливания; Светодиодная (LED); Нет; Другое
it: Tipo di retroilluminazione del tachimetro: Elettroluminescente (EL); Incandescente; LED; Nessuno; Altro
bg-BG: Тип подсветка на скоростомера: Електролуминесцентна (EL); С нажежаема жичка; LED; Няма; Друго
pl: Typ podświetlenia prędkościomierza: Elektroluminescencyjne (EL); Żarowe; LED; Brak; Inne
da: Type af baggrundsbelysning for speedometer: Elektroluminescerende (EL); Glødelampe; LED; Ingen; Andet
fr: Type de rétroéclairage du compteur de vitesse: Électroluminescent (EL); Incandescent; LED; Aucun; Autre
es: Tipo de retroiluminación del velocímetro: Electroluminiscente (EL); Incandescente; LED; Ninguno; Otro
sk-SK: Typ podsvietenia rýchlomera: Elektroluminiscenčné (EL); Žiarovkové; LED; Žiadne; Iné
hu: Sebességmérő háttérvilágításának típusa: Elektrolumineszcens (EL); Izzólámpás; LED; Nincs; Egyéb
tr: Hız göstergesi arka aydınlatma tipi: Elektrolüminesans (EL); Akkor; LED; Yok; Diğer
zh-CN: 速度表背光类型: 电致发光 (EL); 白炽灯; LED; 无; 其他
fi: Nopeusmittarin taustavalon tyyppi: Elektroluminesenssi (EL); Hehkulamppu; LED; Ei mitään; Muu
de: Art der Tachometer-Hintergrundbeleuchtung: Elektrolumineszierend (EL); Glühlampe; LED; Keine; Sonstige